District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-1018

Rules.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 20, 36 DCR 595
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-1007, § 8-1008, and § 8-1017.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3418.

Editor's Notes

Approval in part and disapproval in part of proposed rules: Pursuant to Resolution 8-102, the “District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act Proposed Rules Approval and Disapproval Resolution of 1989”, effective October 10, 1989, the Council approved in part and disapproved in part the proposed rules issued pursuant to the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988.

Pursuant to Resolution 8-201, the “District of Columbia Solid Waste Management & Multi-Material Recycling Act Proposed Amendments to Rules Approval & Disapproval Resolution of 1990”, effective February 9, 1990, the Council approved in part and disapproved in part the proposed rules issued pursuant to the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988.

Approval and disapproval of amendments to rules: Pursuant to Resolution 8-228, the “District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act Proposed Mayoral Amendments to Rules Approval & Disapproval Resolution of 1990”, effective June 8, 1990, the Council approved, in part, and disapproved, in part, the proposed Mayoral amendments to the rules issued pursuant to the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988.

Recycling Rules Amendment Conditional Approval Resolution of 1992: Pursuant to Resolution 9-231, effective May 22, 1992, the Council conditionally approved the proposed rules to amend the recycling regulations and corresponding schedule of fines.

For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.